Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-119
Conveyances between husband and wife; effect.

A married person has the power to convey effectively property directly to his or her spouse in the same manner and to the same extent as if he or she were unmarried. Property so conveyed shall be subject to the rights of the grantor as spouse of the grantee in the same manner and to the same extent as property otherwise acquired by the grantee.

Laws 1941, c. 153, § 19, p. 598;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 76-1019;

R.S.1943, § 76-119.